Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 47.
STATE AD VALOREM TAX PROHIBITION.

State ad valorem tax prohibited.

No ad-valorem tax shall be levied upon property by the State.

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by H.J.R. No. 1 (see Acts 1957, p. 1488) and filed in the office of the Secretary of State on March 27, 1957. It was approved at the general election on Nov. 4, 1958, by a vote of 139,293 for and 108,135 against.